test/src/morphology/V-igaabw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - igābõ: # Verb 49 'eng /est igatseda/fin' - full paradigm
     igābõ+V+Inf: igābõ
     igābõ+V+Ger: igābõs
     igābõ+V+Sup: igābõm
     igābõ+V+Sup+Ine: igābõmõs
     igābõ+V+Sup+Ela: igābõmõst
     igābõ+V+Sup+Tra: igābõmõks
     igābõ+V+Sup+Abe: igābõmõt
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: igābõb
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: igābõt
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: igābõbõd
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: igābiz
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [igābizt, igābiztõ]
     igābõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [igābizt, igābiztõ]
     igābõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: igāb
     igābõ+V+Cond+Sg3: igābõks
     igābõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: igāb
     igābõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: igāb
     igābõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: igābõgid
     igābõ+V+Jus+Sg3: igābõg
     igābõ+V+Quo+Sg3: igābiji
     igābõ+V+ActPrfPrc: igābõn
     igābõ+V+PssPrfPrc: igābdõd
